Florida, session 2026, SB624.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âPresent subsection (2) of section 741.325, 12 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (3), and a new 13 subsection (2) is added to that section, to read: 14 741.325âRequirements for batterersâ intervention programs.â 15 (2)âA batterersâ intervention program may offer 16 supplemental faith-based activities to participants. 17 Participation in such activities may not be required as part of 18 the program. 19 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.